Tennessee statutes. Title 3 Legislature
Part 1

Tennessee Ethics Commission Act of 2006 — Ethics Commission

3-6-101. Short title.

Parts 1 and 2 of this chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Ethics Commission Act of 2006.”

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 26.

Compiler's Notes. Former §§3-6-101 —3-6-115 (Acts 1975, ch. 313, § 1-10; 1976, ch. 568, § 1; 1976, ch. 770, §§ 1-4; T.C.A., §§ 3-602 — 3-610; Acts 1980, ch. 585, § 1; 1984, ch. 857, §§ 1-10; 1985, ch. 164, §§ 1-3; 1989, ch. 585, §§ 21-25; 1989, ch. 589, §§ 2-8, 10, 12-14; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1990, ch. 943, §§ 2, 4; 1990, ch. 1049, §§ 1, 2, 4-6; 1991, ch. 519, §§ 10, 11; 1992, ch. 978, §§ 5, 6; 1992, ch. 988, § 9; 1995, ch. 305, §§ 61, 62; 1995, ch. 529, §§ 2-10, 12, 13; 1995, ch. 531, § 8; 1996, ch. 1063, § 1; 1997, ch. 268, §§ 1-4; 1998, ch. 889, §§ 1, 2; 1998, ch. 1062, §§ 2-6; 1999, ch. 523, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 414, §§ 3, 5, 7; 2005, ch. 488, § 1), concerning the Tennessee Lobbyist Registration and Disclosure Act, was repealed by Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 26, effective February 15, 2006. For similar law, see title 3, chapter 6, part 3.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

3-6-102. Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the general assembly that the integrity of the processes of government be secured and protected from abuse. The general assembly recognizes that a public office is a public trust and that the citizens of Tennessee are entitled to a responsive, accountable, and incorruptible government. The Tennessee ethics commission is established to sustain the public's confidence in government by increasing the integrity and transparency of state and local government through regulation of lobbying activities, financial disclosure requirements, and ethical conduct. A determination of the intent of the general assembly shall be based on the operative statutory provisions, as well as the legislative history pertaining to such statutory provisions, as evidenced by legislative committee and floor actions, discussions and debates.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 26; 2008, ch. 1182, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

Attorney General Opinions. Advising and consulting with business clients under the Ethics Act, OAG 05-096 (6/17/05).

Consulting under the Ethics Act of 2005, OAG 05-098 (6/20/05).

Legislator as president of the Tennessee Professional Fire Fighters Association, OAG 05-126 (8/22/05).

A lobbyist who is not licensed as an attorney is engaged in the unauthorized practice of law only if he or she, in the course of lobbying, is rendering services that call for the professional judgment of a lawyer, OAG 05-132 (8/24/05).

3-6-103. Creation — Composition — Staff — Selection of members — Terms — Meetings.

There is created as a division of the bureau of ethics and campaign finance, as provided in title 4, chapter 55, a Tennessee ethics commission. The commission shall be composed of six (6) members appointed as provided in this section.

Appointments shall be made to reflect the broadest possible representation of Tennessee citizens. Of the six (6) members appointed, at least one (1) shall be a female member and one (1) shall be an African-American member. However, an African-American female member shall not satisfy the requirement of one (1) female member and one (1) African-American member. Each member shall:

Have been a legal resident of this state for five (5) years immediately preceding selection;

Be at least thirty (30) years of age;

Be a registered voter in Tennessee;

Be a person of high ethical standards who has an active interest in promoting ethics in government; and

Not have been convicted of a felony.

No person shall be appointed to the commission if the person, or any member of the person's immediate family as defined in § 3-6-301, is announced as a candidate for public office, holds public office, or is a member of a political party's state executive committee.

The members of the ethics commission shall also serve as members of the board of directors of the bureau of ethics and campaign finance.

The members of the Tennessee ethics commission shall be selected as follows:

The governor shall appoint one (1) member who is a member of the majority party and one (1) member who is a member of the minority party;

The speaker of the senate shall appoint one (1) candidate from a list of three (3) candidates submitted by the majority caucus of the senate and one (1) candidate from a list of three (3) candidates submitted by the minority caucus of the senate. The speaker of the senate may request a second list of candidates; however, no candidate from the original list of candidates may appear on the second list of candidates; and

The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one (1) candidate from a list of three (3) candidates submitted by the majority caucus of the house of representatives and one (1) candidate from a list of three (3) candidates submitted by the minority caucus of the house of representatives. The speaker of the house of representatives may request a second list of candidates; however, no candidate from the original list of candidates may appear on the second list of candidates.

Each gubernatorial appointee shall be subject to confirmation by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of approval by each house of the general assembly and each legislative appointee shall be subject to confirmation by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of approval by the appointing authority's house. If the general assembly is in session when an appointment is made, then the appointment shall be subject to confirmation within ninety (90) days of appointment. If the general assembly is not in session when an appointment is made, the appointment shall be subject to confirmation within ninety (90) days after the general assembly next convenes following the appointment. If an appointee is refused confirmation, or is not confirmed during the ninety-day period, then the appointing authority of the appointee shall select another appointee for confirmation subject to the requirements of this section. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the vacating member's office was originally filled. Notwithstanding this subdivision (c)(2), an appointment to serve on the initial commission shall be made by April 1, 2006.

The initial members' terms of office shall commence upon appointment. For purposes of calculating the initial terms of the members' offices, the initial appointments shall be deemed to be made on January 1, 2007. The initial members' terms shall be staggered as follows:

The gubernatorial appointees shall serve initial terms of two (2) years;

The senate appointees shall serve initial terms of three (3) years; and

The house of representatives appointees shall serve initial terms of four (4) years.

After the initial terms, members of the commission shall serve four-year terms.

The initial chair of the commission shall be appointed by the governor. Every year thereafter the commission shall elect a chair from among its membership. The chair shall serve in that capacity for one (1) year and shall be eligible for reelection. The chair shall preside at all meetings and shall have all the powers and privileges of the other members.

The commission shall fix the place and time of its regular meetings by order duly recorded in its minutes. Four (4) members of the commission shall constitute a quorum. Except as provided in § 3-6-201, four (4) affirmative votes are required for any commission action. Special meetings shall be called by the chair on the chair's initiative or upon the written request of three (3) members. Members shall receive written notice three (3) days in advance of a special meeting. Notice shall be served personally or left at a member's usual place of residence and shall specify the purpose, time and place of the meeting. No matters unrelated to the specified purpose may be considered without a specific waiver by all members of the commission.

The members of the commission shall receive no compensation; provided, that each member of the commission shall be eligible for reimbursement of expenses and mileage in accordance with the regulations promulgated by the commissioner of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

No member of the commission or the member's immediate family, as defined in § 3-6-301, shall during such membership:

Be allowed to hold or qualify for elective office to any state or local public office, as defined in § 2-10-102;

Be an employee of the state or any political subdivision of the state;

Be an officer of any political party or political committee;

Permit such person's name to be used or make campaign contributions in support of or in opposition to any candidate or proposition, except that a member's immediate family may make campaign contributions in support of or in opposition to any candidate or proposition;

Participate in any way in any election campaign;

Lobby or employ a lobbyist; or

Be employed by any elected officeholder, either in an official capacity or as an individual, or be employed by any business in which an elected officeholder has any direct input concerning employment decisions.

An incumbent member of the commission may seek votes for confirmation of the member's appointment to the commission; provided, that the member shall comply with the provisions of subsection (h).

Subsection (h) shall be applicable for one (1) year subsequent to the removal, vacancy or termination of the term of office of a member of the commission.

Each member of the commission shall, before they proceed to business, take an oath or affirmation to support the constitution of this state and of the United States and the laws of this state and also the following oath: I do solemnly swear (or affirm) that as a member of this commission, I will, in all matters, vote without favor, affection, partiality, or prejudice; and that I will not propose or assent to any action, measure, or resolution which shall appear to me to be contrary to law.

Unless otherwise provided by law, any member of the commission who violates the oath of office for the member's position or participates in any of the activities prohibited by this chapter commits a Class A misdemeanor. If a sworn complaint is made pursuant to § 3-6-209 that a member has violated the oath of office for the position, has participated in any of the activities prohibited by this chapter, or has committed actions inconsistent with the intent of the Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006, Acts 2006, ch. 1 of the extraordinary session of the 104th general assembly, then, upon a unanimous vote of the remaining members, the member against whom the sworn allegation is made may be suspended from the commission for such purposes and for such times as the remaining members shall unanimously determine; but no such suspension shall extend beyond final disposition of the sworn complaint pursuant to § 3-6-209. The accused member shall not participate in the suspension vote.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 26; 2009, ch. 556, §§ 12-14; 2019, ch. 163, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

Amendments. The 2019 amendment, in (c)(2), substituted “ninety (90) days” for “thirty (30) days” and substituted “ninety-day period” for “thirty (30) day period”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 163, § 3. April 18, 2019.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality of provision reserving seats on the commission for African-American and female members, OAG 06-047 (3/13/06).

Eligibility to be a member of the Tennessee ethics commission, OAG 06-056 (3/28/06).

3-6-104. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §3-6-104 (Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 26), concerning the executive director and other staff of the Tennessee ethics commission, was repealed by Acts 2009, ch. 556, § 15, effective July 1, 2009.

3-6-105. Jurisdiction of commission — Referral of complaints.

The Tennessee ethics commission is vested with jurisdiction to administer and enforce this chapter, §§ 2-10-115 and 2-10-122 — 2-10-130, and title 8, chapter 50, part 5.

In addition to the jurisdiction vested in subsection (a), with respect to members of the general assembly, the commission also has jurisdiction to investigate, in accordance with § 3-6-203, complaints alleging acts by a member of the general assembly that constitute misuse of office for personal financial gain; provided, however, that, if a member of the general assembly makes the declaration required by § 2-10-127(d), then the member shall not be deemed to have misused the member's office for personal financial gain based solely upon the member's relationship to a sibling, spouse or child who lobbied for or against the legislative action.

The ethics committee in each house is authorized to refer to the commission for investigation, in accordance with § 3-6-203, any complaint it receives alleging a violation of this chapter, §§ 2-10-115 and 2-10-122 — 2-10-130, title 8, chapter 50, part 5, or misuse of legislative office for personal financial gain.

The governor is authorized to refer to the commission for investigation, in accordance with § 3-6-203, any allegation the governor receives concerning a violation by an officer or staff member of the executive branch subject to the jurisdiction of the commission, pursuant to this chapter, §§ 2-10-115 and 2-10-122 — 2-10-130, title 8, chapter 50, part 5, an executive order related to ethics, or misuse of office for personal financial gain.

The commission shall refer to the registry of election finance for investigation and appropriate action any complaint filed with the commission that is within the jurisdiction of the registry.

The commission is vested with jurisdiction over any violation of the laws administered and enforced by the commission, or any alleged violation referred to the commission pursuant to this section, that occurs within five (5) years prior to the filing of a complaint alleging a violation.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 26; 2009, ch. 556, § 16.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

Cross-References. Bureau of ethics and campaign finance, title 4, ch. 55.

3-6-106. Duties of the commission and the attorney general and reporter.

The duties of the Tennessee ethics commission include the following:

Recommend guiding principles of ethical conduct for consideration and adoption by the legislative or executive branches. The commission shall publish the guiding principles on the commission's web site. Guiding principles of ethical conduct may be recommended for each of the following classifications:

Members of the general assembly;

The governor, secretary of state, treasurer, comptroller of the treasury, members of the governor's cabinet, and cabinet level staff within the governor's office; and

Lobbyists and employers of lobbyists;

Develop filing, coding and cross-indexing systems;

Make as many documents filed available for viewing on the Internet as is reasonable based on the commission's financial resources, and make each document filed available for public inspection and copying during regular office hours at the expense of any person requesting copies of the documents; provided, that this subdivision (a)(3) does not apply to those documents required to be confidential pursuant to § 3-6-202;

Review all filed documents to ensure compliance with the laws administered and enforced by the commission. Statements filed with the commission for more than two (2) years shall be deemed to be sufficient, absent a showing of fraud or the existence of an ongoing investigation related to the statement;

Accept and file any information voluntarily supplied that exceeds the requirements of this chapter;

Prepare and publish on the commission's web site reports as are deemed to be appropriate and in the public interest by the commission, including quarterly reports listing alphabetically all registered lobbyists and employers of lobbyists, as defined in part 3 of this chapter;

Prepare and publish manuals and guides to facilitate compliance with, and enforcement of, the laws administered and enforced by the commission;

Administer ethics training as provided in this part;

Provide an annual report to the governor and the general assembly by February 1 concerning the administration and enforcement of laws under the jurisdiction of the commission, including the necessity, or lack of necessity, for any additional action or additional legislation that will serve to further the purposes of this chapter;

Investigate any alleged violation, upon sworn complaint or upon its own motion, as provided in § 3-6-201; and

Preserve all filed reports or statements for a period of at least five (5) years from the date of receipt, or longer when there is a pending investigation by the commission or any law enforcement agency, or when there is an ongoing administrative or judicial proceeding related to the information.

It is the duty of the attorney general and reporter to render opinions and give counsel to the commission upon the request of the executive director or the commission.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 26; 2009, ch. 556, § 17.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

Cross-References. Bureau of ethics and campaign finance, title 4, ch. 55.

3-6-107. Powers of the commission.

The Tennessee ethics commission possesses power to:

Subpoena witnesses, compel their attendance and testimony, conduct audits, administer oaths, take evidence and require, by subpoena duces tecum, the production of books, papers, records or other evidence needed for the performance of the commission's duties or exercise of its powers, including its duties and powers of investigation;

Issue written advisory opinions to any person subject to the jurisdiction of the commission in accordance with §§ 3-6-117 and 3-6-308(a)(4). When issuing any advisory opinion or any other interpretive document, the commission shall review and consider all operative statutory provisions, as well as the legislative history pertaining to the statutory provisions, as evidenced by legislative committee and floor actions, discussions and debates;

Request legal and investigative assistance from the office of the attorney general and reporter;

Conduct a hearing to determine if an actual violation has occurred;

Issue an appropriate order following a determination of an actual violation;

Assess and collect late filing fees in amounts provided by statute;

Assess and collect a civil penalty as provided in this chapter, title 8, chapter 50, part 5, and rules promulgated pursuant to this chapter and title 8, chapter 50, part 5; provided, that the commission shall only have the power to assess a civil penalty after notice and opportunity for hearing; and

Seek injunctive relief in the chancery court of Davidson County to prevent continuing violations of this chapter.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 26; 2008, ch. 1182, § 2; 2009, ch. 556, § 18.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

Cross-References. Bureau of ethics and campaign finance, title 4, ch. 55.

3-6-108. Prospective application of chapter.

For the purposes of enforcement, this chapter shall be prospective only, and the Tennessee ethics commission shall limit its investigations to acts or omissions that occur on or after October 1, 2006.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 26.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

Attorney General Opinions. Lobbyist campaign donations, OAG 06-025 (2/6/06).

3-6-109. Referral of criminal violations to law enforcement.

Where the results of an investigation indicate a criminal violation has occurred, the commission shall refer the matter to the appropriate law enforcement agency.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 26.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

3-6-110. Authority to petition for an order of enforcement.

The Tennessee ethics commission has the authority to petition the chancery court, through the attorney general and reporter or its own legal counsel, for enforcement of any order it has issued. The court's order of enforcement has the same force and effect as a civil judgment.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 26.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

3-6-111. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §3-6-111 (Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 26), concerning fees collected by the Tennessee ethics commission, was repealed by Acts 2009, ch. 556, § 19, effective July 1, 2009.

3-6-112. Annual ethics course for supervisory personnel in the executive branch — Manuals and guides.

The Tennessee ethics commission shall provide an annual ethics course concerning compliance with the laws administered and enforced by the commission for supervisory personnel in the executive branch of state government. The commission shall notify administrative departments and divisions in advance of the time and location of the course. The course may be offered on multiple occasions in locations that will make attendance by personnel in the three (3) grand divisions reasonably convenient. The ethics course shall include, but not be limited to, discussion of relevant laws, administrative regulations, advisory opinions, current ethical issues and situations, and development of problem-solving skills.

Administrative departments and divisions shall annually select appropriate supervisory personnel and shall communicate the name, position, and contact information of each individual required to attend the annual course to the commission prior to February 1.

In addition to any other manuals or guides prepared and published by the commission, the commission shall provide a manual for supervisory personnel of the executive branch that includes ethics statutes and administrative regulations relevant to such personnel, explanations of purposes and principles underlying the laws, explanations of technical and specific legal requirements, examples of practical applications of the laws and principles, a question-and-answer section regarding common problems and situations, summaries of advisory opinions, and any other information that would inform supervisory personnel of the executive branch about ethics laws and regulations and assist them in applying those laws and regulations to specific situations. The manual may be distributed to supervisory personnel, and shall be made available to the public, by posting the manual in pdf format on the commission's web site.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 26.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch.1, part 2.

3-6-113. Annual orientation ethics course and current issues course for members of the general assembly — Manuals and guides.

The Tennessee ethics commission shall provide an annual orientation ethics course concerning compliance with the laws administered and enforced by the commission for members of the general assembly who have not yet taken the orientation ethics course and shall offer an annual current issues course for members of the general assembly who have taken the orientation course. Such courses shall be offered on a date or dates when the general assembly is in session. The commission shall notify members in advance of the time and location of the courses.

The orientation ethics course shall include, but not be limited to, laws administered and enforced by the commission, administrative regulations, relevant internal policies, specific technical and legal requirements, summaries of advisory opinions, underlying purposes and principles of ethics laws, examples of practical applications of ethics laws, and a question-and-answer participatory segment regarding common problems and situations.

The current issues course shall include, but not be limited to, discussion of changes in relevant laws, administrative regulations, new advisory opinions, current ethical issues and situations, and development of problem-solving skills.

Members of the general assembly shall attend the courses provided by the commission pursuant to subsection (a). However, a member may petition the commission to approve an ethics course other than a course offered by the commission to fulfill the current issues course requirement.

In addition to any other manuals or guides prepared and published by the commission, the commission shall provide a manual for members of the general assembly that includes ethics statutes and administrative regulations relevant to members, explanations of purposes and principles underlying the laws, explanations of technical and specific legal requirements, examples of practical applications of the laws and principles, a question-and-answer section regarding common problems and situations, summaries of advisory opinions, and any other information that would inform members about ethics laws and regulations and assist them in applying those laws and regulations to specific situations. The manual may be distributed to members of the general assembly, and shall be made available to the public, by posting the manual in pdf format on the commission's web site.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 26.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

3-6-114. Annual ethics course for lobbyists and employers of lobbyists — Manuals and guides.

The Tennessee ethics commission shall provide an annual ethics course on multiple dates, both when the general assembly is in session and when the general assembly is not in session for both lobbyists and employers of lobbyists. The training may be offered electronically. Training shall include, but not be limited to, laws administered and enforced by the commission, administrative regulations, relevant internal policies, specific technical and legal requirements, and summaries of advisory opinions. The commission shall impose a fee for attending the ethics course that will enable participation in the course to be funded from the fee.

Each lobbyist shall attend one (1) ethics course annually. A lobbyist may petition the commission to approve an ethics course other than a course offered by the commission to fulfill the ethics course requirement. A lobbyist may also attend one (1) of the annual ethics courses provided for members of the general assembly pursuant to § 3-6-113 in lieu of the course described in this section.

In addition to any other manuals or guides prepared and published by the commission, the commission shall provide a manual for lobbyists and employers of lobbyists that includes ethics statutes and administrative regulations relevant to lobbyists and employers of lobbyists, explanations of purposes and principles underlying the laws, explanations of technical and specific legal requirements, examples of practical applications of the laws and principles, a question-and-answer section regarding common problems and situations, summaries of advisory opinions, and any other information that would inform lobbyists and employers of lobbyists about ethics laws and regulations and assist them in applying those laws and regulations to specific situations. The manual may be distributed to lobbyists and employers of lobbyists, and shall be made available to the public, by posting the manual in pdf format on the commission's web site.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 26; 2007, ch. 413, § 1; 2008, ch. 697, § 1; 2011, ch. 124, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

Attorney General Opinions. The prohibition contained in T.C.A. §3-6-114 applies to non-registered lobbyists, OAG 06-013 (1/19/06).

3-6-115. Electronic filing and registration system.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the Tennessee ethics commission shall:

Develop, with the advice, assistance and approval of the division of strategic technology solutions, an Internet-based electronic filing process for use by all persons that are required to electronically register or file statements and reports with the commission pursuant to this chapter, §§ 2-10-115 and 2-10-122 — 2-10-130, and title 8, chapter 50, part 5;

Develop, with the advice, assistance and approval of the division of strategic technology solutions, a system that provides each person required to register or file statements and reports with the commission secure access to the electronic registration and filing system. The system shall provide adequate safeguards to prevent unauthorized persons from inappropriately tampering with or changing the data and shall provide for secure authentication safeguards for documents such as electronic signatures and electronic notarization;

Provide training to each person required to register or file statements and reports with the commission on the use of the electronic filing system;

Make, with the advice, assistance and approval of the division of strategic technology solutions, electronically filed reports and statements available for viewing on the commission's web site in a format that is searchable and that may be downloaded and managed by a user with appropriate software; provided, that this subdivision (a)(4) does not apply to those documents required to be confidential pursuant to § 3-6-202. In addition to any other method of information management developed by the commission, conflict of interest disclosures shall be indexed and searchable by county; and

Beginning on October 1, 2006, with the advice, assistance and approval of the division of strategic technology solutions, provide the public access to lists compiled from the registrations and other documents filed by employers of lobbyists, lobbyists, and persons required to file conflict of interest disclosures. In addition, the commission shall provide assistance to anyone seeking to access this information on the Internet.

The commission, once the development of the electronic filing system is completed and tested, shall provide public notice that the system is operational and available for filers to commence use.

The commission shall, with the advice, assistance and approval of the division of strategic technology solutions, implement the electronic filing system for use by October 1, 2006. Any person required to electronically file statements and reports with the commission shall file required statements and reports electronically on or after October 1, 2006. Any required statements and reports filed with the registry of election finance prior to October 1, 2006, shall continue to be filed with the registry until such date.

All information entered by any person required to file statements and reports electronically with the commission shall remain confidential until the information is submitted to the commission.

The commission shall strive to establish electronic filing for all documents required to be filed with the commission; provided, however, that no candidate or appointee to a local public office, as defined in § 2-10-102, shall be required to electronically file documents with the commission.

Except as provided in this subsection (e), the commission, unless otherwise required by law to provide for electronic filing, shall have the discretion to determine when electronic filing is financially feasible and will be an accessible and efficient method of filing.

The commission shall establish rules specifying the manner in which a report, statement or other documents shall be filed. The rules shall be published and posted conspicuously on the commission's web site at least sixty (60) days prior to the due date of any document affected by the rules.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 26; 2008, ch. 735, § 1; 2009, ch. 556, § 16; 2020, ch. 690, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

Amendments. The 2020 amendment substituted “division of strategic technology solutions” for “office of information resources” throughout (a) and in the first sentence of (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 690, § 22, June 11, 2020.

Cross-References. Bureau of ethics and campaign finance, title 4, ch. 55.

Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

3-6-116. Training program for members of the commission.

A person who is appointed to the Tennessee ethics commission may not vote, deliberate, or be counted as a member in attendance at a meeting of the commission until the person completes a training program provided by the office of the attorney general and reporter that complies with this section. This section shall not apply to members who are reappointed to the commission for a subsequent term.

The training program shall provide the person with information regarding:

The legislation that created the commission;

The role and function of the commission;

The rules of the commission, with an emphasis on the rules that relate to disciplinary and investigatory authority;

The current budget for the commission;

The results of the most recent formal audit of the commission;

The requirements of the laws administrated and enforced by the commission; and

Any applicable policies adopted by the commission.

A person appointed to the commission is entitled to reimbursement for expenses incurred in attending the training program.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 26.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

3-6-117. Exclusive authority to issue formal advisory opinions.

The commission is the only entity authorized to issue formal advisory opinions. All opinions that deal with any statutory provision or provisions that are in any way subject to interpretation, unclear or uncertain, or subject to dispute as to their meaning or application are formal advisory opinions. With respect to an issue addressed in a formal advisory opinion, any person who conforms that person's behavior to the requirements of the advisory opinion shall not be sanctioned if it is later determined that the advisory opinion did not correctly interpret the statute. A person who requests an advisory opinion shall be entitled to withdraw the request at any time before the opinion is issued, in which case the commission shall not issue the opinion.

Except as provided in this subsection (b), under no circumstances shall a person performing staff duties as an employee of the commission have the authority to issue an advisory opinion, including an informal response.

A person performing staff duties as the executive director or as an attorney is authorized to give informal responses to any person subject to the jurisdiction of the commission in accordance with this subsection (b).

The commission shall make and keep records of all inquiries and all informal responses given, including the name and position of the person making the inquiry, the entity, if any, on behalf of which the inquiry is made, the date of the inquiry, the person responding to the inquiry, the precise inquiry, including the facts and background information provided and the section or sections of statute involved, and the answer or response given.

The commission shall compile all of the information in subdivision (b)(3), which shall include a mechanism to ascertain the responses to all inquiries about the same statutory section, so that the responses will be consistent or can be prudently revised if necessary.

An informal response may be given verbally or by electronic mail. Any verbal informal response shall be verified by electronic mail. Whether or not a request for an informal response is answered verbally, all informal responses shall be issued by electronic mail to the person who made the request, with a copy to the members of the commission. Each informal response shall:

Set forth the facts and background information of the inquiry;

Cite the relevant operative statutory section or sections and the language in the section or sections on which the response is based; and

Refer to any relevant advisory opinions issued by the commission that relate to the inquiry.

The informal response shall be based on such information, the operative provisions of the cited statute and the legislative history pertaining to the statutory provisions, as evidenced by legislative committee and floor actions, discussions and debates. In addition, the informal response shall indicate whether the statute and any previous opinions are clear or unclear on the issue.

If the person who requested the informal response conforms that person's behavior to the requirements of the informal response, then that person shall not be sanctioned if it is later determined that the informal response was not a correct response or incorrectly interpreted the statutory section or sections or commission advisory opinions on the issue.

Any informal response shall be subject to review or modification by the commission. Any person who disputes the informal response given by the staff employees in subdivision (b)(2) shall have the right to request a formal advisory opinion from the commission.

Acts 2008, ch. 1182, § 4.